Idaho, session 2025, S1134.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 9, Title 23, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 23-903d, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
23-903d. LICENSES ISSUED TO ESTABLISHED CATERERS. (1) Upon registra-
tion with the director of the Idaho state police as an established caterer
and upon application to the director for an established caterer liquor li-
cense and notwithstanding the population limitations set forth in section
23-903(1), Idaho Code, nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the issuance
of an established caterer liquor license to the owner, operator, or lessee of
an established caterer for use at events catered by the established caterer,
subject to the provisions of this section. "Established caterer" means a
catering business that has been in operation for no less than five (5) years
and has catered and will continue to cater no fewer than twenty-five (25)
events per year.
(2) An established caterer liquor license shall be for onetime use only
at an event catered by the established caterer. There shall be no limitation
on the number of established caterer liquor licenses that an established
caterer may apply for.
(3)(a) An established caterer selling liquor pursuant to an estab-
lished caterer liquor license shall abide by the following:
(i) Liquor shall be dispensed and prepared for consumption by the
established caterer licensed pursuant to this section only in ar-
eas approved by the local licensing authority; and
(ii) All liquor sales shall cease at the time food services cease.
The local licensing authority may impose additional date and time
restrictions on liquor sales.
(b) No established caterer licensed pursuant to this section shall pro-
mote or operate the catering event as a bar and lounge.
(4) Established caterer liquor licenses shall not count toward the lim-
itation on the number of licenses issued according to population, as pro-
vided in section 23-903(1), Idaho Code.
(5) An established caterer liquor license may not be sold or leased and
shall not be transferable to any other caterer.
(6) The fees for licenses granted pursuant to this section shall be as
set forth in section 23-904(11), Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. That Section 23-904, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
23-904. LICENSE FEES. Each licensee licensed under the provisions of
this act shall pay an annual license fee to the director as follows:
(1) For each license in a city of one thousand (1,000) population or
less, three hundred dollars ($300) per annum.
(2) For each license in a city of from one thousand (1,000) to three
thousand (3,000) population, five hundred dollars ($500) per annum.
(3) For each license in a city having a population of more than three
thousand (3,000), seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per annum.
(4) For each railroad train for sale only in buffet, club or dining
cars, fifty dollars ($50.00) per annum of the scheduled run of such train
within the state of Idaho; provided, that such license shall be in full, and
in lieu of all other licenses herein provided for.
(5) For each common carrier boat line for sale only in buffet, club din-
ing rooms, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per annum. Such license shall be
in full, and in lieu of all other licenses herein provided for.
(6) For each license issued to the owner, operator, or lessee of a golf
course as described in section 23-903, Idaho Code, or to the lessee of any
premises situate on such golf course, situate in any county having a popula-
tion of:
(a) Less than twenty thousand (20,000), two hundred dollars ($200) per
annum;
(b) Twenty thousand (20,000) but less than forty thousand (40,000),
three hundred dollars ($300) per annum; and
(c) Forty thousand (40,000) or more, four hundred dollars ($400) per
annum.
(7) For each common carrier airline for sale only in common carrier air-
craft, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per annum. Such license shall be in
full, and in lieu of all other licenses herein provided for.
(8) For each license issued to the owner, operator, or lessee of a
restaurant operated on an airport, as described in section 23-903, Idaho
Code, situate within the corporate limits of a city, the fee shall be the same
as provided in paragraphs (1) through (3), inclusive, of this section.
(9) For each license issued to the owner, operator, or lessee of a
restaurant operated on an airport, as described in section 23-903, Idaho
Code, situate without the corporate limits of a city, the fee shall be the
same as provided in paragraph (6) of this section. Licenses issued under and
pursuant to the provisions of this act shall expire at 1:00 o'clock a.m. on
the first day of January of the following year.
(10) For each license issued to an owner or operator of a year-round
resort as described in section 23-957, Idaho Code, a one (1) time fee of
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), with a subsequent renewal fee of
three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per annum. For each license
issued to an owner or operator of a beverage, lodging or dining facility
within the premises of a year-round resort as described in section 23-957,
Idaho Code, a one (1) time fee of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) with
a subsequent renewal fee of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per
annum. For each license issued to a lessee of a beverage, lodging or dining


facility within the premises of the year-round resort as described in sec-
tion 23-957, Idaho Code, a one (1) time fee of twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000) with a subsequent renewal fee of three thousand five hundred dol-
lars ($3,500) per annum.
(11) For each license issued to the owner, operator, or lessee of an
established caterer, as described in section 23-903d, Idaho Code, the fee
shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per annum for registration as an
established caterer and fifty dollars ($50) for each established caterer
liquor license granted for a catering event.
Provided that any licensee who operates for only a portion of a year may
have his license fee prorated from the date he commences operation to the end
of the calendar year, but in no event for less than six (6) months.
In the event a licensee who was previously issued a license on a prorated
basis under the provisions hereof desires to have such license renewed for
the same period for the next succeeding year, he shall file his intention to
so apply for such license with the director, accompanied by the fee required
for the issuance of such license on or before December 31 of the year preced-
ing.
The license fees herein provided for are exclusive of and in addition to
other license fees chargeable in the state of Idaho.
The basis upon which respective populations of municipalities shall be
determined is the last preceding census or any subsequent special census
conducted by the United States bureau of the census, unless a direct enumer-
ation of the inhabitants thereof be made by the state of Idaho, in which case
such later direct enumeration shall constitute such basis.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.